Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1135
Children with disabilities who are less than five years of age; regional plan of services; school district; participation; supplementary amendments.

Each school district shall demonstrate participation in a plan of services for children with disabilities who are less than five years of age. Such plans shall be prepared on a regional basis as determined by the department and updated annually.

The content of plans shall be prescribed by the department.

Supplementary amendments to any program plans may be submitted on dates specified by the department during the same school year and shall be subject to the same review as the initial plans.

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-646.08;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3328;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 817;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 40;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 28.